Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. ORGANIZATION OF MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE A. TYPES OF MUNICIPALITIES

CHAPTER 8. TYPE C GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY

SUBCHAPTER A. INCORPORATION AS TYPE C GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY

Sec. 8.001. AUTHORITY TO INCORPORATE AS TYPE C GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. (a) A community may incorporate under this subchapter as a Type C general-law municipality if it:

(1) constitutes an unincorporated city, town, or village;

(2) contains 201 to 4,999 inhabitants; and

(3) meets the territorial requirements prescribed by Section 5.901.

(b) A community incorporating as a Type C general-law municipality adopts the commission form of government.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 8.002. PETITION TO INCORPORATE. The residents of a community may initiate an attempt to incorporate under this subchapter by filing with the county judge a written petition signed by at least 10 percent of the qualified voters of the community. The petition must request the county judge to order an election to determine whether the community will incorporate as a Type C general-law municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 8.003. ELECTION ORDER. If a county judge receives the petition and if satisfactory proof is made that the community contains the requisite number of inhabitants, the judge shall order an incorporation election to be held on a specified date and at a designated place in the community.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 8.004. ELECTION OFFICERS. The county judge shall appoint two election judges and two election clerks to conduct the incorporation election under this subchapter. The county judge shall designate one of the election judges to be the presiding judge.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 8.005. NOTICE OF ELECTION. Notice of an incorporation election under this subchapter must be published in a newspaper in the community before the 30th day before the date of the election, or if there is no newspaper in the community, the notice must be posted at three public places in the community for the 30 days preceding the date of the election.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 8.006. ORDER OF INCORPORATION. If a majority of the votes cast in an election under this subchapter are for incorporation, the county judge shall enter an order in the minutes of the commissioners court that the community is incorporated. The incorporation is effective on the date the order is entered.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER B. CHANGE FROM ANOTHER MUNICIPAL TYPE TO TYPE C GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY

Sec. 8.021. AUTHORITY TO CHANGE TO TYPE C GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. (a) A Type A general-law municipality containing 501 to 4,999 inhabitants or a Type B general-law municipality containing 501 to 999 inhabitants may change to a Type C general-law municipality.

(b) A municipality changing to a Type C general-law municipality adopts the commission form of government.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 8.022. PETITION TO CHANGE. The residents of a municipality may initiate an attempt to make the change under this subchapter by filing with the mayor of the municipality a written petition signed by at least 10 percent of the qualified voters of the municipality. The petition must request the mayor to order an election to determine whether the municipality will change to a Type C general-law municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 8.023. ELECTION ORDER. If the mayor receives the petition, the mayor shall order an election on the question of the change to be held in the municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 8.024. ELECTION OFFICERS. The mayor shall appoint two election judges and two election clerks to conduct the election under this subchapter. The mayor shall designate one of the election judges to be the presiding judge.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 8.025. NOTICE OF ELECTION. In addition to the notice required by Chapter 4, Election Code, notice of an election under this subchapter must be published in a newspaper in the municipality before the 30th day before the date of the election, or if there is no newspaper in the municipality, the notice must be posted at three public places in the municipality for the 30 days preceding the date of the election.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 8.026. ORDER OF CHANGE. If a majority of the votes cast in an election under this subchapter are for the change, the mayor shall enter an order in the minutes of the municipality's governing body that the municipality is changed. The change is effective from the time the order is entered.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.